District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.02

Possession and self-administration of medication.

A student may possess and self-administer medication at the school in which the student is currently enrolled, at school-sponsored activities, and while on school-sponsored transportation, in order to treat asthma, anaphylaxis, or other illness; provided, that:

(1)

The responsible person has submitted a valid medication action plan to the school; and

(2)

All other conditions set forth in this subchapter are met.

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 3, 54 DCR 12230
Section 3 of Law 17-52 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 3. Possession and self-administration of medication.
“A student may possess and self-administer medication at the school in which the student is currently enrolled, at school-sponsored activities, and while on school-sponsored transportation, to treat asthma, anaphylaxis, or other potentially life-threatening illness; provided, that:
“(1) The responsible person has submitted a valid medication action plan to the school; and
“(2) All other conditions set forth in this act, or in rules promulgated pursuant to this act, are met.”
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 17-52 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Student Access to Treatment Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-82, July 26, 2007, 54 DCR 7999).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Student Access to Treatment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-140, October 17, 2007, 54 DCR 10736).